Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2603
Board; members; removal; grounds; procedure.

Members of the State Board of Health may be removed by the Governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, failure to maintain the qualifications for the position for which appointed, or misconduct in office, but only after delivering to the member a copy of the charges and affording the member an opportunity of being publicly heard in person or by counsel in his or her own defense, upon not less than ten days' notice. Such hearing shall be held before the Governor. If such member is removed, the Governor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of all charges made against such member and the Governor's findings thereon, together with a complete record of the proceedings.

Laws 1953, c. 335, § 9, p. 1103;

Laws 2003, LB 56, § 3.